Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-108
Interest; rate; when calculated by the year.

When in any law, or in any instrument in writing specifying a rate of interest, no period of time is mentioned for which such rate is to be calculated, it shall be deemed to be by the year.

Laws 1879, § 9, p. 115;

R.S.1913, § 3354;

C.S.1922, § 2842;

C.S.1929, § 45-109;

R.S.1943, § 45-108.